Utah statutes.
53B-2a-110.   Campus board of directors -- Powers and duties.

(1)  A campus board of directors shall:

(a)  assist the campus president in preparing a budget request for its annual operations to the Utah College of Applied Technology Board of Trustees;

(b)  after consulting with the Utah College of Applied Technology, other higher education institutions, school districts, and charter schools within its region, prepare a comprehensive strategic plan for delivering career and technical education within its region;

(c)  consult with business, industry, the Department of Workforce Services, the Governor's Office of Economic Development, and the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget on an ongoing basis to determine what workers and skills are needed for employment in Utah businesses and industries;

(d)  develop programs based upon the information gathered in accordance with Subsection (1)(c), including expedited program approval and termination procedures to meet market needs;

(e)  adopt an annual budget and fund balances;

(f)  develop policies for the operation of career and technical education facilities under its jurisdiction;

(g)  establish human resources and compensation policies for all employees in accordance with policies of the Utah College of Applied Technology Board of Trustees;

(h)  approve credentials for employees and assign employees to duties in accordance with the Utah College of Applied Technology Board of Trustees policies and accreditation guidelines;

(i)  conduct annual program evaluations;

(j)  appoint program advisory committees and other advisory groups to provide counsel, support, and recommendations for updating and improving the effectiveness of training programs and services;

(k)  approve regulations, both regular and emergency, to be issued and executed by the campus president;

(l)  coordinate with local school boards, school districts, and charter schools to meet the career and technical education needs of secondary students; and

(m)  develop policies and procedures for the admission, classification, instruction, and examination of students in accordance with the policies and accreditation guidelines of the Utah College of Applied Technology and the State Board of Education.

(2)  Subsection (1)(g) does not apply to a campus president.

(3)  A campus board of directors may not exercise any jurisdiction over career and technical education provided by a school district or charter school or provided by a higher education institution independently of a college campus.

(4)  If a program advisory committee or other advisory group submits a printed recommendation to the campus board of directors, the campus board of directors shall acknowledge the recommendation with a printed response that explains the campus board of directors' action regarding the recommendation and the reasons for the action.

